Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB258.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Carbon Monoxide Alarm Standards in Dormitories Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Approved carbon monoxide alarm." The term includes:(1) A single or multiple station carbon monoxide alarm listed as complying with the approved American National Standard for Safety for Single and Multiple Station Carbon Monoxide Alarms (ANSI/UL2034) or a carbon monoxide detector listed as complying with the approved American National 1234567891011121314151617 Standard for Safety for Gas and Vapor Detectors and Sensors (ANSI/UL2075) installed in accordance with this act.(2) A device that may be combined with a smoke alarm or smoke detector if the combined smoke alarm or detector meets all of the following:(i) Complies with either of the following:(A) The approved American National Standard for Safety for Single and Multiple Station Carbon Monoxide Alarms (ANSI/UL2034) for carbon monoxide alarms and the approved American National Standard for Safety for Single and Multiple Station Smoke Alarms (ANSI/UL217) for smoke alarms.(B) The approved American National Standard for Safety for Gas and Vapor Detectors and Sensors (ANSI/UL2075) for carbon monoxide detectors and the approved American National Standard for Safety for Smoke Detectors for Fire Alarm Systems (ANSI/UL268) for smoke detectors.(ii) Emits an alarm in a manner that clearly differentiates between detecting the presence of carbon monoxide and the presence of smoke.(3) A carbon monoxide detection system that includes carbon monoxide detectors and audible notification appliances that are installed and maintained in accordance with the National Fire Alarm and Signaling Code (NFPA 72) and the Standard for the Installation of Carbon Monoxide (CO) Detection and Warning Equipment (NFPA 720) and are in compliance with the approved American National Standard for Safety for Gas and Vapor Detectors and Sensors (ANSI/UL2075)."Dormitory." A building containing one or more housing units 20250SB0258PN0211 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owned or leased by an institution of higher education which is used as a residence by the students of the institution of higher education."Fossil fuel." Coal, kerosene, oil, wood, fuel gases and other petroleum or hydrocarbon products that emit carbon monoxide as a by-product of combustion."Housing unit." A room or suite of two or more rooms that is occupied, leased for occupation or intended or designed to be occupied as a residence by the students of an institution of higher education."Installed." A carbon monoxide alarm that is hardwired into the electrical wiring, directly plugged into an electrical outlet without a switch, other than a circuit breaker, or, if the alarm is battery-powered, attached to the wall or ceiling of a dormitory or a housing unit, in accordance with the Standard for the Installation of Carbon Monoxide (CO) Detection and Warning Equipment (NFPA 720)."Institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A university within the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(2) A community college established under Article XIX-A of the Public School Code of 1949.(3) A State-related institution as defined in section 1502-A of the Public School Code of 1949.(4) A college or university which is operated not for profit, located in and incorporated or chartered by the Commonwealth and entitled to confer degrees as set forth in 24 Pa.C.S. § 6505 (relating to power to confer degrees)."Operational." Working and in service.20250SB0258PN0211 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Administration.Nothing in this act is intended to modify the authority and responsibilities of the Department of Labor and Industry under the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act.Section 4. Carbon monoxide alarm requirements.(a) Dormitories.--Each dormitory that uses a fossil-fuel-burning heater or appliance or has an attached garage must have an operational, centrally located and approved carbon monoxide alarm installed in the vicinity of the fossil-fuel-burning heater or appliance and in every housing unit that is located on the same story as the fossil-fuel-burning heater or appliance or attached garage within 18 months of the effective date of this section.(b) Maintenance, repair or replacement.--The governing body of an institution of higher education is responsible for providing for the maintenance, repair or replacement of an approved carbon monoxide alarm and the care and replacement of batteries.Section 5. Enforcement.Willful failure to install or maintain an operational approved carbon monoxide alarm required by this act is a summary offense punishable by a fine of up to $50.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0258PN0211 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425